Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,192
Not-for-profit organization; limitation on immunity.

The individual immunity granted by section 25-21,191 shall not extend to any act or omission of such director, officer, or trustee which results in damage or injury (1) caused by such director, officer, or trustee during the operation of any motor vehicle, airplane, or boat or (2) caused by such director, officer, or trustee while impaired by alcohol or any controlled substance enumerated in section 28-405.

Laws 1987, LB 67, § 3.